New York, session 2025-2026, S4386.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 94-e 2 to read as follows: 3 § 94-e. Chief sustainability officer. 1. Purpose. The chief sustaina- 4 bility officer shall coordinate efforts across all agencies and other 5 state government entities to address climate change mitigation and 6 climate sustainability efforts in New York state. 7 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this section: 8 (a) "Officer" shall mean the chief sustainability officer appointed 9 pursuant to this section. 10 (b) "State agency" or "state agencies" shall mean any state depart- 11 ment, board, bureau, division, commission, committee, public authority, 12 public corporation, council, office or other governmental entity 13 performing a governmental or proprietary function of the state, except 14 the judiciary or the state legislature. 15 3. The governor shall appoint a chief sustainability officer. Such 16 chief sustainability officer shall accomplish the duties set forth in 17 this section in an effort to advise and assist state agencies in an 18 ongoing coordinated response to address climate change. Such chief 19 sustainability officer shall receive a salary, to be fixed by the gover- 20 nor within the amounts appropriated therefor. 21 4. The chief sustainability officer shall: 22 (a) Review rules and regulations of state agencies and submit proposed 23 amendments and/or additions of such rules and regulations to such agen- 24 cies for consideration that the officer shall deem appropriate or neces- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04322-01-5 S. 4386 2 1 sary to help mitigate negative impacts of climate change and promote 2 climate sustainability; 3 (b) Coordinate policy to promote energy and environmental sustainabil- 4 ity across state government operations, including the office of general 5 services, the New York state energy research and development authority, 6 the department of environmental conservation, and the department of 7 state; 8 (c) Work with state agencies and departments to ensure effective 9 implementation and achievement of statutory requirements and state goals 10 related to energy and environmental protection; 11 (d) Coordinate implementation of programs and initiatives to improve 12 state facility and vehicle fleet efficiency and promote adoption of 13 energy efficient technologies and the modernization of state facilities 14 and operations; 15 (e) Design and share with state agencies and departments strategies 16 that can be used to leverage state facilities and assets to advance the 17 conservation of natural resources and highlight best environmental, 18 technological and policy strategies to reach the highest energy effi- 19 ciency standards reasonably possible; 20 (f) Develop sustainable practices to plan for and mitigate enterprise 21 risks while reducing waste and to help strengthen commercial, cultural, 22 and political cooperation and engagement; 23 (g) Advise state agencies and departments in best practices for envi- 24 ronmental regulatory compliance, reporting, partnerships and outreach, 25 and environmental sustainability innovation; 26 (h) Assist the department of state in reducing its use of natural 27 resources through improving energy and water efficiency, and providing 28 data and tools that protect the health of the state government's person- 29 nel and employees and their families; 30 (i) Partner with private sector businesses, public and private univer- 31 sities, and government agencies to improve environmental sustainability 32 across the state; 33 (j) Participate in inter-agency working groups that develop environ- 34 mental requirements and guidance for state agencies; 35 (k) Act as a representative of New York state at the United States 36 Climate Alliance and other national and international organizations 37 focused on climate science and sustainability research and goals that 38 the chief sustainability officer shall deem appropriate; 39 (l) Inform the governor, secretary, legislature, and state agencies 40 and other governmental entities of the latest research and developments 41 in the field of climate science; 42 (m) Advise and assist the New York state climate action council estab- 43 lished pursuant to section 75-0103 of the environmental conservation law 44 in such duties of such council that the chief sustainability officer 45 shall deem appropriate; and 46 (n) Be the state's coordinator for the implementation of the climate 47 leadership and community protection act. 48 5. All state agencies shall cooperate with the chief sustainability 49 officer to ensure that the chief sustainability officer is able to 50 fulfill the requirements under this section. 51 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 52 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.